Kentucky statutes. TITLE XIV Libraries And Archives
Oral History Interviews

171.400.
Oral history interview — Confidentiality.

A state agency or institution which obtains an oral history interview for historical purposes may enter into a reasonable and mutually acceptable written agreement of confidentiality with the interviewee with regard thereto.

An oral history interview which has been obtained under a written agreement of confidentiality shall remain confidential and shall not be public information until the conditions of the agreement have been met, at which time it shall become public information.

An oral history interview for which no written agreement of confidentiality has been made shall be public information and shall not be confidential.

This section shall be deemed to be retroactive and shall apply with equal force to oral history interviews for which a written agreement of confidentiality was obtained prior to July 15, 1986.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 38, § 1, effective July 15, 1986.